New York, session 2025-2026, S1127.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a-4) of subdivision 2 of section 131-a of the 2 social services law, as added by section 1 of part D of chapter 57 of 3 the laws of 2012, is amended and a new paragraph (a-5) is added to read 4 as follows: 5 (a-4) For the period beginning October first, two thousand twelve and 6 [thereafter] ending June thirtieth, two thousand twenty-five, the 7 following shall be the standard of monthly need for determining eligi- 8 bility for all categories of assistance in and by all social services 9 districts: 10 Number of Persons in Household 11 One Two Three Four Five Six 12 $158 $252 $336 $433 $534 $617 13 For each additional person in the household there shall be added an 14 additional amount of eighty-five dollars monthly. 15 (a-5) For the period beginning July first, two thousand twenty-five, 16 the following shall be the standard of monthly need for determining 17 eligibility for all categories of assistance in and by all social 18 services districts: 19 Number of Persons in Household 20 One Two Three Four Five Six 21 $316 $504 $672 $866 $1068 $1234 EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00647-01-5 S. 1127 2 1 For each additional person in the household there shall be added an 2 additional amount of two hundred eighty-two dollars monthly. 3 Annually thereafter, the standard of monthly need for determining 4 eligibility for all categories of assistance in and by all social 5 services districts shall be increased based on the current cost of 6 living adjustments as determined by the federal social security adminis- 7 tration. 8 § 2. Paragraph (a-4) of subdivision 3 of section 131-a of the social 9 services law, as added by section 2 of part D of chapter 57 of the laws 10 of 2012, is amended and a new paragraph (a-5) is added to read as 11 follows: 12 (a-4) For the period beginning October first, two thousand twelve and 13 [thereafter] ending June thirtieth, two thousand twenty-five, persons 14 and families determined to be eligible by the application of the stand- 15 ard of need prescribed by the provisions of subdivision two of this 16 section, less any available income or resources which are not required 17 to be disregarded by other provisions of this chapter, shall receive 18 maximum monthly grants and allowances in all social services districts, 19 in accordance with the following schedule, for public assistance: 20 Number of Persons in Household 21 One Two Three Four Five Six 22 $158 $252 $336 $433 $534 $617 23 For each additional person in the household there shall be added an 24 additional amount of eighty-five dollars monthly. 25 (a-5) For the period beginning July first, two thousand twenty-five, 26 persons and families determined to be eligible by the application of the 27 standard of need prescribed by the provisions of subdivision two of this 28 section, less any available income or resources which are not required 29 to be disregarded by other provisions of this chapter, shall receive 30 maximum monthly grants and allowances in all social services districts, 31 in accordance with the following schedule, for public assistance: 32 Number of Persons in Household 33 One Two Three Four Five Six 34 $316 $504 $672 $866 $1068 $1234 35 For each additional person in the household there shall be added an 36 additional amount of two hundred eighty-two dollars monthly. 37 Annually thereafter, the standard of monthly need for determining 38 eligibility for all categories of assistance in and by all social 39 services districts shall be increased based on the current cost of 40 living adjustments as determined by the federal social security adminis- 41 tration. 42 § 3. Subdivision 3-c of section 131-a of the social services law, as 43 amended by chapter 77 of the laws of 1989, is amended to read as 44 follows: 45 3-c. (a) Commencing July first, nineteen hundred eighty-one and ending 46 June thirtieth, two thousand twenty-five, persons and families deter- 47 mined to be eligible by the application of the standard of need 48 prescribed by the provision of subdivision two of this section, shall 49 receive a home energy grant equal to the following monthly amounts: 50 Number of Persons in Household 51 One Two Three Four Five Six 52 $14.10 $22.50 $30.00 $38.70 $47.70 $55.20 53 For each additional needy person in the household, there shall be 54 added an additional amount of seven dollars and fifty cents. 55 (b) For the period beginning July first, two thousand twenty-five, 56 persons and families determined to be eligible by the application of the S. 1127 3 1 standard of need prescribed by the provisions of subdivision two of this 2 section, shall receive a home energy grant equal to the following month- 3 ly amounts: 4 Number of Persons in Household 5 One Two Three Four Five Six 6 $28.20 $45 $60 $77.40 $95.40 $110.40 7 For each additional needy person in the household there shall be added 8 an additional amount of fifty dollars. 9 Annually thereafter, the standard of monthly need for determining 10 eligibility for all categories of assistance in and by all social 11 services districts shall be increased based on the current cost of 12 living adjustments as determined by the federal social security adminis- 13 tration. 14 § 4. Subdivision 3-d of section 131-a of the social services law, as 15 added by chapter 60 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read as follows: 16 3-d. (a) Commencing January first, nineteen hundred eighty-six and 17 ending June thirtieth, two thousand twenty-five, for persons and fami- 18 lies determined to be eligible by the application of the standard of 19 need prescribed by the provisions of subdivision two of this section, 20 the amounts set forth in paragraph (a) of subdivision three of this 21 section, after application of subdivision three-c of this section, shall 22 be increased by the following amounts as a monthly supplemental home 23 energy grant: 24 Number of Persons in Household 25 One Two Three Four Five Six 26 $11 $17 $23 $30 $37 $42 27 For each additional needy person in the household, there shall be 28 added an additional amount of five dollars monthly. 29 (b) For the period beginning July first, two thousand twenty-five, for 30 persons and families determined to be eligible by the application of the 31 standard of need prescribed by the provisions of subdivision two of this 32 section, the amounts set forth in paragraph (a) of subdivision three of 33 this section, after application of subdivision three-c of this section, 34 shall be increased by the following amounts as a monthly supplemental 35 home energy grant: 36 Number of Persons in Household 37 One Two Three Four Five Six 38 $22 $34 $46 $60 $74 $84 39 For each additional needy person in the household, there shall be 40 added an additional amount of twenty-eight dollars monthly. 41 Annually thereafter, the standard of monthly need for determining 42 eligibility for all categories of assistance in and by all social 43 services districts shall be increased based on the current cost of 44 living adjustments as determined by the federal social security adminis- 45 tration. 46 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.